src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
кепе:кепе ADV_КУДО  "paljain jaloin" ;
эль-эль:эль-эль ADV_КАЛ  "" ;
пельксэнь-пелькс:пельксэнь-пелькс ADV_ОШ  "" ;
васенцекс:васенцекс ADV_ОШ  "" ;
апарсте:апарсте MANNER_  "XX" ;
кромойстэ:кромойстэ MANNER_  "ontuen" ;
вельть:вельть Ad-A_  "" ;
дюм:дюм Ad-A_  "" ;
зыглый:зыглый Ad-A_  "" ;
пек:пек Ad-A_  "" ;
пельс:пельс Ad-A_  "" ;
тунь:тунь Ad-A_  "" ;
вачодо:вачодо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
комадо:комадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
кунст:кунст Pred2  "" ;
ландядо:ландядо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
ласте:ласте PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
лондадо:лондадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
наксадо:наксадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
озадо:озадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
панжадо:панжадо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
пульзядо:пульзядо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
стядо:стядо PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
чавонь% кедть:чавонь% кедть Pred2  "" ;
штадо:штадо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
штапо:штапо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
ялго:ялго PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "jalkaisin" ;
иредьстэ:иредьстэ PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО  "" ;
иредьстэ:иретьстэ PRED2-SUBJ_КУДО_Sub  "" ;
овсе:овсе ADV_  "aivan" ;
пря% алов:пря% алов Spat_  "" ;
авапрясо:авапрясо Adv-Ine  "" ;
алкинестэ:алкинестэ ADV_  "" ;
ансяк:ансяк Exclusive  "" ;
башка:башка ADV_  "" ;
беремасо:беремасо Adv-Ine  "" ;
вазокс:вазокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
вайгелень% апак% нолда:вайгелень% апак% нолда Adv_Phrase  "" ;
валонь% апак% учо:валонь% апак% учо Adv_Phrase  "" ;
ванолк:ванолк ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ваньксстэ:ваньксстэ ADV_  "" ;
вашокс:вашокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
видеяк:видеяк ADV-PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
виевекс:виевекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
виень% апак% жаля:виень% апак% жаля Adv_Phrase  "" ;
вырр:вырр ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
диль:диль ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
долкс:долкс ADV_  "" ;
дуборсо:дуборсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
дубот:дубот ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
дыр-дыр:дыр-дыр ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
зорякс:зорякс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
зуйк:зуйк ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
зуйсэ:зуйсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
истяк:истяк ADV_ЛАК  "" ;
истямо% ладсо:истямо% ладсо Adv-Ine  "" ;
кайтянь-кать:кайтянь-кать Adv_Phrase  "" ;
кашторсо:кашторсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
кевекс:кевекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
кедень% апак% максо:кедень% апак% максо Adv-Ine  "" ;
кеместэ:кеместэ ADV_  "" ;
клявк:клявк ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
коволокс:коволокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
честна:честна ADV_КУДО  "rehellisesti" ;
корсо:корсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
лавожакс:лавожакс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
лавшосто:лавшосто ADV_  "" ;
лангсек-лангсек:лангсек-лангсек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
лип:лип ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ломанькс:ломанькс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
лосьсэ:лосьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
мейлангт:мейлангт ADV_  "" ;
мелень% апак% путо:мелень% апак% путо Adv_Phrase  "" ;
мелень% ютавтомга:мелень% ютавтомга Adv_Phrase  "" ;
неикс:неикс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
нумолокс:нумолокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
оймекс:оймекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
оймень% апак% тално:оймень% апак% тално Adv_Phrase  "" ;
оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо:оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо Adv-Ine  "" ;
пакшт:пакшт ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
пальтонь% апак% кая:пальтонь% апак% кая Adv_Phrase  "" ;
пекстерьсэ:пекстерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
пецек-пецек:пецек-пецек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
пецерьсэ:пецерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
польдерьсэ:польдерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
превейстэ:превейстэ ADV_  "" ;
прянек-пильгенек:прянек-пильгенек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
ревекс:ревекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
ристьсэ:ристьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
седейшкасто:седейшкасто ADV_  "" ;
сэтьместэ:сэтьместэ ADV_  "" ;
сюронь% кекшема% тарка:сюронь% кекшема% тарка Adv_Phrase  "" ;
сёрсо:сёрсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
сётор:сётор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ухсо:ухсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
цятор-цютор:цятор-цютор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
цяторсо:цяторсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
самай:самай Ad-A_  "juuri" ;
чачков:чачков ADV_  "" ;
чикор-лакор:чикор-лакор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
эчкестэ:эчкестэ ADV_  "" ;
якшт:якшт ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ёзмолсо:ёзмолсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
ёколт-ёколт:ёколт-ёколт Adv_Phrase  "" ;
ялатеке:ялатеке ADV_КУДО  "kuitenkin" ;
алашакс:алашакс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
апарсте:апарсте MANNER_  "" ;
вадрясто:вадрясто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
даволкс:даволкс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
истяня:истяня MANNER_  "" ;
казямосто:казямосто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
калгодосто:калгодосто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
кежевстэ:кежевстэ MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
мейгенерть:мейгенерть MANNER_  "" ;
эрязасто:эрязасто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
шумбрасто-парсте:шумбрасто-парсте MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
ёндолокс:ёндолокс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
ёнсто:ёнсто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
истя:истя MANNER_  "" ;
таймазасто:таймазасто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
эрейстэ:эрейстэ MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
авасов:авасов Spat_  "" ;
алов% ведть:алов% ведть Spat_  "" ;
васов:васов Spat_  "" ;
венеле:венель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
вепеле:вепель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
вере:верь ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
видьга:видьга Spat_  "" ;
видьшка:видьшка Spat_  "" ;
икелев:икелев Spat_  "" ;
кавалало:кавалал ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
кершев:кершев SPAT-Lat  "" ;
кудыкеле:кудыкель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
ланга:ланга SPAT-Prl  "" ;
чокшне% ланга:чокшне% ланга SPAT-Prl  "illansuussa" ;
латало:латал ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
масторо:мастор ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
мейс:мейс Spat_  "" ;
мекев:мекев Spat_  "" ;
тей-тов:тей-тов Spat_  "sinne sun tänne" ;
оляв:оляв Spat_  "" ;
пачк:пачк ADV-TEMP_  "aina" ;
пачк:пачк ADV-SPAT_  "läpi" ;
пеле:пель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
перть:перть Spat_  "" ;
пертьпеле:пертьпель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "ympärillä" ;
перька:перька ADV-SPAT-IS-PRL  "" ;
потсо:потсо SPAT-Ine  "" ;
потсто:потсто SPAT-Ela  "" ;
пряло:прял ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
сезэнь:сезэнь ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
сезэнь:сезэ ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
сеске:сеске ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
сеске:сеск ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
сестэ:сестэ ADV-IS-SPAT-ELA  "" ;
сесэ:сесэ ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тезэнь:тезэнь ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
тезэнь:тезэ ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
тей:тей ADV-IS-SPAT-LAT  "" ;
теск:теск ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
теске:теске ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тестэ:тестэ ADV-IS-SPAT-ELA  "" ;
тестэ-тосто:тестэ-тосто ADV-IS-SPAT-ELA  "" ;
тесэ:тесэ ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тесэ-тосо:тесэ-тосо ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тия:тия ADV-IS-SPAT-PRL  "" ;
тия-тува:тия-тува ADV-IS-SPAT-PRL  "" ;
тияка:тияка ADV-IS-SPAT-PRL  "" ;
тияня:тияня ADV-IS-SPAT-PRL  "" ;
тов:тов ADV-IS-SPAT-LAT  "sinne" ;
товоло:товол ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
тозонь:тозонь ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
тозонь:тозо ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
томбале:томбаль ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
тоск:тоск ADV-IS-SPAT-ILL  "" ;
тоско:тоско ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тосо:тосо ADV-IS-SPAT-INE  "" ;
тосто:тосто ADV-IS-SPAT-ELA  "" ;
тува:тува ADV-IS-SPAT-PRL  "" ;
чипеле:чипель ADV-SPAT_АЛО  "" ;
а% кувать:а% кувать ADV-TEMP_КИТ  "" ;
а% курок:а% курок ADV-TEMP_ЛАК  "" ;
буряне:буряне ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
валдова:валдова Temp-Prl  "" ;
валске:валске ADV-TEMP_КУДО  "" ;
ванды:ванды ADV-TEMP_  "huomenna" ;
кавонькирда:кавонь#кирда ADV_КУДО  "" ;
вандыде% мейле:вандыде% мейле ADV_КУДО  "" ;
веньперть:вень#перть ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
знярсыя:знярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
зярдо:зярдо Temp-Interr  "" ;
зяросто:зяросто Temp-Interr  "" ;
зярсыя:зярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
икелепеле:икелепеле ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
икелепелев:икелепелев SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
исяк:исяк ADV-TEMP_ЛАК  "" ;
косто-косто:косто-косто Temp-Distr  "" ;
кувать:кувать ADV-TEMP_КИТ  "" ;
куватьс:куватьс Temp-Ill  "" ;
курок:курок ADV-TEMP_ЛАК  "nopeasti" ;
куроксто:куроксто ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
маныть:маныть Temp-Pl  "" ;
меелькспелев:меелькспелев Temp-Lat  "" ;
мейле:мейле ADV-TEMP_КУДО  "" ;
меля:меля ADV-TEMP_КУДО  "" ;
мелят:мелят Temp-Pl  "" ;
нацькес:нацькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
нейке:нейке ADV-TEMP_КУДО  "" ;
одсто:одсто Temp-Ela  "" ;
пелеве% шкане:пелеве% шкане ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
пелеветь:пелеветь Temp-Pl  "" ;
пиземе% шкасто:пиземе% шкасто Temp-Ela  "" ;
седикеле:седикеле ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
секе% тев:секе% тев Temp-Lat  "" ;
талай:талай ADV-TEMP_  "kauan" ;
талайс:талайс Temp-Ill  "" ;
талайть:талайть Temp-Pl  "" ;
течике:течике ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
течимс:течимс Temp-ms  "" ;
течис:течис Temp-Ill  "" ;
улкоть:улкоть ADV-TEMP_КИТ  "" ;
умок:умок ADV-TEMP_ЛАК  "" ;
цютькес:цютькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
чи% валдова:чи% валдова Temp-Prl  "" ;
чи% куншка:чи% куншка ADV-TEMP_КУДО  "" ;
чинек-венек:чинек-венек Temp-Coll  "" ;
чинзэ% чоп:чинзэ% чоп ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
чоп:чоп ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
чоподава:чоподава Temp-Prl  "" ;
шкань-шкань:шкань-шкань Temp-Distr  "" ;
якшамоне:якшамоне ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
